Utah statutes.
17B-2a-306.   Offices of a fire protection district board of trustees and
principal place of business.
Each office of a fire protection district board of trustees and each principal
place of business of a fire protection district shall be within:
(1)  the district; or
(2)  the county in which the district is located and as near as possible to
the district.
